Tennessee, session 114, SB0820.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-8-301(a), is amended by adding
the following as the last sentence of the subsection:
The board may produce and make available, electronically or in a printed, physical
medium, a copy of the tenure policy.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0820
002399
- 1 -